Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.210

Watershed management partnerships—Indebtedness—Bonds.

Where a watershed management partnership formed under the authority of RCW 39.34.200 establishes a separate legal entity to conduct the cooperating undertaking of the partnership, such legal entity is authorized for the purpose of carrying out such undertaking to contract indebtedness and to issue and sell general obligation bonds pursuant to and in the manner provided for general county bonds in chapters 36.67 and 39.46 RCW and other applicable statutes, and to issue revenue bonds pursuant to and in the manner provided for revenue bonds in chapter 36.67 RCW and other applicable statutes. The joint board established by the partnership agreement shall perform the functions referenced in chapter 36.67 RCW to be performed by the county legislative authority in the case of county bonds.

[ 2003 c 327 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2003 c 327: See note following RCW 39.34.190.